Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2356
Public power and irrigation district funds; deposits; limitation.

The deposits secured by a surety bond shall at no time exceed the amount of the penal sum of such surety bond.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2356;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 45.